Illinois, session 104th, HB3508.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Low-Level Radioactive Waste 5Management Act is amended by changing Sections 3 and 4 as 6follows: 7    (420 ILCS 20/3)  (from Ch. 111 1/2, par. 241-3)8    Sec. 3. Definitions. As used in this Act: 9    "Agency" or "IEMA-OHS" means the Illinois Emergency 10Management Agency and Office of Homeland Security, or its 11successor agency. 12    "Broker" means any person who takes possession of 13low-level waste for purposes of consolidation and shipment.14    "Compact" means the Central Midwest Interstate Low-Level 15Radioactive Waste Compact.16    "Decommissioning" means the measures taken at the end of a 17facility's operating life to assure the continued protection 18of the public from any residual radioactivity or other 19potential hazards present at a facility.20    "Director" means the Director of the Agency.21    "Disposal" means the isolation of waste from the biosphere 22in a permanent facility designed for that purpose.23    "Facility" means a parcel of land or site, together with   HB3508 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 09464 BDA 19525 b1structures, equipment and improvements on or appurtenant to 2the land or site, which is used or is being developed for the 3treatment, storage or disposal of low-level radioactive waste. 4"Facility" does not include lands, sites, structures, or 5equipment used by a generator in the generation of low-level 6radioactive wastes.7    "Generator" means any person who produces or possesses 8low-level radioactive waste in the course of or incident to 9manufacturing, power generation, processing, medical diagnosis 10and treatment, research, education, or other activity.11    "Hazardous waste" means a waste, or combination of wastes, 12which because of its quantity, concentration, or physical, 13chemical, or infectious characteristics may cause or 14significantly contribute to an increase in mortality or an 15increase in serious, irreversible, or incapacitating 16reversible, illness; or pose a substantial present or 17potential hazard to human health or the environment when 18improperly treated, stored, transported, or disposed of, or 19otherwise managed, and which has been identified, by 20characteristics or listing, as hazardous under Section 3001 of 21the Resource Conservation and Recovery Act of 1976, P.L. 2294-580 or under regulations of the Pollution Control Board.23    "High-level radioactive waste" means:24        (1) the highly radioactive material resulting from the 25    reprocessing of spent nuclear fuel including liquid waste 26    produced directly in reprocessing and any solid material   HB3508 Engrossed- 3 -LRB104 09464 BDA 19525 b1    derived from the liquid waste that contains fission 2    products in sufficient concentrations; and3        (2) the highly radioactive material that the Nuclear 4    Regulatory Commission has determined, on July 21, 1988 5    (the effective date of Public Act 85-1133) this Amendatory 6    Act of 1988, to be high-level radioactive waste requiring 7    permanent isolation.8    "Low-level radioactive waste" or "waste" means radioactive 9waste not classified as (1) high-level radioactive waste, (2) 10transuranic waste, (3) spent nuclear fuel, or (4) byproduct 11material as defined in Sections 11e(2), 11e(3), and 11e(4) of 12the Atomic Energy Act of 1954 (42 U.S.C. 2014). This 13definition shall apply notwithstanding any declaration by the 14federal government, a state, or any regulatory agency that any 15radioactive material is exempt from any regulatory control. 16    "Mixed waste" means waste that is both "hazardous waste" 17and "low-level radioactive waste" as defined in this Act.18    "Nuclear facilities" means nuclear power plants, 19facilities housing nuclear test and research reactors, 20facilities for the chemical conversion of uranium, and 21facilities for the storage of spent nuclear fuel or high-level 22radioactive waste.23    "Nuclear power plant" or "nuclear steam-generating 24facility" means a thermal power plant in which the energy 25(heat) released by the fissioning of nuclear fuel is used to 26boil water to produce steam.  HB3508 Engrossed- 4 -LRB104 09464 BDA 19525 b1    "Nuclear power reactor" means an apparatus, other than an 2atomic weapon, designed or used to sustain nuclear fission in 3a self-supporting chain reaction. 4    "Person" means an individual, corporation, business 5enterprise, or other legal entity either public or private and 6any legal successor, representative, agent, or agency of that 7individual, corporation, business enterprise, or legal entity.8    "Post-closure care" means the continued monitoring of the 9regional disposal facility after closure for the purposes of 10detecting a need for maintenance, ensuring environmental 11safety, and determining compliance with applicable licensure 12and regulatory requirements, and includes undertaking any 13remedial actions necessary to protect public health and the 14environment from radioactive releases from the facility.15    "Regional disposal facility" or "disposal facility" means 16the facility established by the State of Illinois under this 17Act for disposal away from the point of generation of waste 18generated in the region of the Compact.19    "Release" means any spilling, leaking, pumping, pouring, 20emitting, emptying, discharging, injecting, escaping, 21leaching, dumping, or disposing into the environment of 22low-level radioactive waste.23    "Remedial action" means those actions taken in the event 24of a release or threatened release of low-level radioactive 25waste into the environment, to prevent or minimize the release 26of the waste so that it does not migrate to cause substantial   HB3508 Engrossed- 5 -LRB104 09464 BDA 19525 b1danger to present or future public health or welfare or the 2environment. The term includes, but is not limited to, actions 3at the location of the release such as storage, confinement, 4perimeter protection using dikes, trenches or ditches, clay 5cover, neutralization, cleanup of released low-level 6radioactive wastes, recycling or reuse, dredging or 7excavations, repair or replacement of leaking containers, 8collection of leachate and runoff, onsite treatment or 9incineration, provision of alternative water supplies, and any 10monitoring reasonably required to assure that these actions 11protect human health and the environment.12    "Scientific Surveys" means, collectively, the Illinois 13State Geological Survey and the Illinois State Water Survey of 14the University of Illinois.15    "Shallow land burial" means a land disposal facility in 16which radioactive waste is disposed of in or within the upper 1730 meters of the earth's surface. However, this definition 18shall not include an enclosed, engineered, structurally 19re-enforced and solidified bunker that extends below the 20earth's surface.21    "Small modular reactor" or "SMR" means an advanced nuclear 22reactor: (1) with a rated nameplate capacity of 300 electrical 23megawatts or less; and (2) that may be constructed and 24operated in combination with similar reactors at a single 25site.26    "Storage" means the temporary holding of waste for   HB3508 Engrossed- 6 -LRB104 09464 BDA 19525 b1treatment or disposal for a period determined by Agency 2regulations.3    "Treatment" means any method, technique, or process, 4including storage for radioactive decay, designed to change 5the physical, chemical, or biological characteristics or 6composition of any waste in order to render the waste safer for 7transport, storage, or disposal, amenable to recovery, 8convertible to another usable material, or reduced in volume.9    "Waste management" means the storage, transportation, 10treatment, or disposal of waste.11    "Water treatment residuals" means biosolids, sludge, 12filter media, anthracite, scales, or other solids, either 13alone or as a component of liquid mixtures or solutions, that 14are technologically enhanced in combined radium concentration 15(radium-226, radium-228 or associated progeny) as a result of 16the treatment of water or sewage containing naturally 17occurring radium from groundwater. 18(Source: P.A. 103-306, eff. 7-28-23; 103-569, eff. 6-1-24; 19revised 7-30-24.) 20    (420 ILCS 20/4)  (from Ch. 111 1/2, par. 241-4)21    Sec. 4. Generator and broker registration. 22    (a)(1) Except as provided in subsection (b), all 23generators of any amount of low-level radioactive waste in 24Illinois shall register with the Agency within 60 days of the 25commencement of generating any low-level radioactive wastes.   HB3508 Engrossed- 7 -LRB104 09464 BDA 19525 b1The registration shall be in a format prescribed by the Agency 2and shall contain all of the following: the name, address, and 3officers of the generator; information on the types of wastes 4produced or possessed; and any other information required by 5the Agency.6    (2) All registered generators of any amount of low-level 7radioactive waste in Illinois shall file an annual report with 8the Agency. The annual report shall contain information on the 9types and quantities of low-level wastes produced in the 10previous year and expected to be produced in the future; the 11methods used to manage these wastes; the technological 12feasibility, economic reasonableness, and environmental 13soundness of alternative treatment, storage and disposal 14methods; and any other information required by the Agency.15    (3) All brokers of any amount of low-level radioactive 16waste in Illinois shall register with the Agency within 60 17days after the commencement of taking possession of any 18low-level radioactive waste. The registration shall be in a 19format prescribed by the Agency and shall contain the name, 20address, and officers of the broker and any other information 21required by the Agency.22    (4) All registered brokers of any amount of low-level 23radioactive waste in Illinois shall file an annual report with 24the Agency. The annual report shall contain information on the 25types and quantities of low-level radioactive wastes received 26and shipped, identification of the generators from whom such   HB3508 Engrossed- 8 -LRB104 09464 BDA 19525 b1wastes were received, and the destination of shipments of such 2wastes.3    (5) All registration forms and annual reports required to 4be filed with the Agency may be made available to the public 5for inspection and copying pursuant to the Freedom of 6Information Act.7    (b) Generators who meet one of the following provisions 8are exempt from the registration requirements in paragraph (1) 9of subsection (a):10        (1) A generator who stores waste containing or 11    composed of radioactive material with a physical half-life 12    of less than 120 days for decay-in-storage before disposal 13    as normal waste or recycling without regard to its 14    radioactivity provided a minimum of 10 half-lives have 15    elapsed. This does not exempt the generator from any other 16    State or federal requirements; or17        (2) A generator of water treatment residuals that have 18    a combined radium concentration of less than or equal to 19    200 picocuries per gram and who has registered pursuant to 20    the Agency's regulatory program for water treatment 21    residuals. 22    (a) All generators and brokers of any amount of low-level 23radioactive waste in Illinois shall register with the Agency. 24Generators shall register within 60 days of the commencement 25of generating any low-level radioactive wastes. Brokers shall 26register within 60 days of taking possession of any low-level   HB3508 Engrossed- 9 -LRB104 09464 BDA 19525 b1radioactive waste. Such registration shall be on a form 2developed by the Agency and shall contain the name, address 3and officers of the generator or broker, information on the 4types and amounts of wastes produced or possessed and any 5other information required by the Agency.6    (b) All registered generators and brokers of any amount of 7low-level radioactive waste in Illinois shall file an annual 8report with the Agency. The annual report for generators shall 9contain information on the types and quantities of low-level 10wastes produced in the previous year and expected to be 11produced in the future, the methods used to manage these 12wastes, the technological feasibility, economic reasonableness 13and environmental soundness of alternative treatment, storage 14and disposal methods and any other information required by the 15Agency. The annual report for brokers shall contain 16information on the types and quantities of low-level 17radioactive wastes received and shipped, identification of the 18generators from whom such wastes were received, and the 19destination of shipments of such wastes.20    (c) All registration forms and annual reports required to 21be filed with the Agency shall be made available to the public 22for inspection and copying.23(Source: P.A. 95-777, eff. 8-4-08.)